Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB562.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 381.697 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every cemetery in Kentucky except private family cemeteries shall be maintained
by its legal owner or owners, without respect to the individual owners of burial
plots in the cemetery, in such a manner so as to keep the burial grounds or cemetery
free of growth of weeds, free from accumulated debris, displaced tombstones, or
other signs and indication of vandalism or gross neglect.
(2) The owner or owners of public or private burial grounds, regardless of size or
number of graves, shall protect the burial grounds from desecration or destruction
as stipulated in KRS 525.115(1)(a), (b), or (c) or from being used for dumping
grounds, building sites, or any other use which may result in the burial grounds
being damaged or destroyed. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the
owner or owners of public or private burial grounds when the public or private
burial grounds have been desecrated, damaged, or destroyed as the result of a crime
by another as defined by KRS 500.080.
(3) The owner or owners of private burial grounds shall be required to construct
cemetery protection structures only if the burial ground is located in a county with a
county cemetery board and if the board provides compensation to the private burial
ground owner for supplies, labor, and other expenses associated with such
construction.
(4) The governing authorities of any city within whose corporate limits any public or
private burial grounds lie shall[may] require the owner or those having claims to
the grounds to properly care for them.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 12/5/2024 3:20 PM Jacketed